zh-CN: 软顶车窗配置: 无窗; 全景后窗; 后窗 + 侧角窗; 后窗 + 侧窗（三窗）; 仅含后窗; 可拆卸车窗; 深色车窗; 其他
en: Soft top window configuration: No windows; Panoramic rear window; Rear + quarter windows; Rear + side windows (3-window); Rear window only; Removable windows; Tinted windows; Other
cs: Konfigurace oken měkké střechy: Bez oken; Panoramatické zadní okno; Zadní a boční okna; Zadní a boční okna (3 okna); Pouze zadní okno; Odnímatelná okna; Tónovaná okna; Jiné
pl: Konfiguracja okien miękkiego dachu: Bez okien; Panoramiczna szyba tylna; Tylna + boczne szyby (ćwiartki); Tylna + boczne szyby (3-okienna); Tylko tylna szyba; Odpinane szyby; Przyciemniane szyby; Inna
bg-BG: Конфигурация на прозорците на мекия покрив: Без прозорци; Панорамен заден прозорец; Заден + странични (четвъртинки) прозорци; Заден + странични прозорци (3 прозореца); Само заден прозорец; Свалящи се прозорци; Затъмнени прозорци; Друго
nl: Raamconfiguratie softtop: Geen ramen; Panoramische achterruit; Achterruit + zijruitjes; Achter- en zijruiten (3-ruits); Alleen achterruit; Verwijderbare ramen; Getinte ramen; Anders
fr: Configuration des vitres de la capote: Sans fenêtres; Lunette arrière panoramique; Lunette arrière + vitres de custode; Lunette arrière + vitres latérales (3 vitres); Lunette arrière uniquement; Fenêtres amovibles; Vitres teintées; Autre
lt-LT: Minkšto stogo langų konfigūracija: Be langų; Panoraminis galinis langas; Galinis langas ir šoniniai langeliai; Galinis ir šoniniai langai (3 langai); Tik galinis langas; Nuimami langai; Tamsuoti langai; Kita
sv: Fönsterkonfiguration för mjukt tak: Inga fönster; Panoramabakruta; Bakruta + sidorutor bak; Bakruta + sidorutor (3-fönster); Endast bakruta; Avtagbara fönster; Tonade fönster; Övrigt
ko: 소프트탑 윈도우 구성: 창문 없음; 파노라마 리어 윈도우; 리어 및 쿼터 윈도우; 리어 및 사이드 윈도우(3-윈도우); 리어 윈도우 전용; 분리형 창문; 틴팅 창문; 기타
de: Fensterkonfiguration des Stoff- oder Textilverdecks: Keine Fenster; Panorama-Heckfenster; Heck- und Ausstellfenster; Heck- und Seitenfenster (3-Fenster); Nur Heckfenster; Herausnehmbare Fenster; Getönte Fenster; Andere
sk-SK: Konfigurácia pláteného okna: Bez okien; Panoramatické zadné okno; Zadné a bočné okná; Zadné a bočné okná (3 okná); Len zadné okno; Odnímateľné okná; Tónované okná; Iná
da: Vindueskonfiguration for softtop: Ingen ruder; Panoramabagrude; Bagrude og sideruder; Bag- og sideruder (3 ruder); Kun bagrude; Aftagelige ruder; Tonede ruder; Andet
pt-BR: Capota de lona, configuração da janela: Sem janelas; Janela traseira panorâmica; Janelas traseiras + laterais pequenas; Janelas traseiras + laterais (3 janelas); Apenas janela traseira; Janelas removíveis; Janelas escuras; Outra
ro-RO: Configurație a geamurilor plafonului decapotabil: Fără geamuri; Lunetă panoramică; Lunetă + geamuri laterale spate; Lunetă + geamuri laterale (3 geamuri); Doar lunetă; Geamuri detașabile; Geamuri fumurii; Altele
sl-SI: Konfiguracija oken platnene strehe: Brez oken; Panoramsko zadnje okno; Zadnje in stransko okno; Zadnja in stranska okna (3-okenska); Samo zadnje okno; Snemljiva okna; Zatemnjena okna; Drugo
th: รูปแบบโครงสร้างหน้าต่างหลังคาผ้าใบ: ไม่มีหน้าต่าง; หน้าต่างหลังแบบพาโนรามา; หน้าต่างหลัง + หูช้าง; หน้าต่างหลัง + ด้านข้าง (3 บาน); หน้าต่างหลังเท่านั้น; หน้าต่างถอดได้; หน้าต่างกรองแสง; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Konfiguracija prozora mekog krova: Bez prozora; Panoramski stražnji prozor; Stražnji + bočni prozori; Stražnji + bočni prozori (3 prozora); Samo stražnji prozor; Uklonjivi prozori; Zatamnjeni prozori; Ostalo
zh-TW: 軟頂車窗配置: 無車窗; 全景後車窗; 後車窗 + 側角窗; 後車窗 + 側車窗 (3 窗); 僅後車窗; 可拆卸車窗; 隔熱車窗; 其他
fi: Kangaskaton ikkunoiden konfiguraatio: Ei ikkunoita; Panoraamatakalasit; Taka- ja sivuikkunat; Taka- ja sivuikkunat (3 ikkunaa); Vain takaikkuna; Irrotettavat ikkunat; Sävytetyt ikkunat; Muu
el: Διαμόρφωση παραθύρου υφασμάτινης οροφής: Χωρίς παράθυρα; Πανοραμικό πίσω παράθυρο; Πίσω παράθυρο + φινιστρίνια; Πίσω + πλαϊνά παράθυρα (3 παράθυρα); Μόνο πίσω παράθυρο; Αφαιρούμενα παράθυρα; Φιμέ παράθυρα; Άλλο
it: Configurazione dei finestrini della capote morbida: Senza finestrini; Finestrino posteriore panoramico; Finestrino posteriore + deflettori; Finestrini posteriori + laterali (3 finestrini); Solo finestrino posteriore; Finestrini rimovibili; Finestrini oscurati; Altro
ru: Конфигурация окон мягкой крыши: Без окон; Панорамное заднее окно; Заднее и боковые окна; Заднее и боковые окна (3 окна); Только заднее окно; Съёмные окна; Тонированные окна; Другое
tr: Açılır tavan pencere konfigürasyonu: Penceresiz; Panoramik arka pencere; Arka ve kelebek pencereler; Arka ve yan pencereler (3 pencere); Sadece arka pencere; Çıkarılabilir pencereler; Renkli pencereler; Diğer
hu: Puha tető ablakkonfigurációja: Nincsenek ablakok; Panoráma hátsó ablak; Hátsó + negyedablakok; Hátsó + oldalsó ablakok (3 ablakos); Csak hátsó ablak; Kivehető ablakok; Sötétített ablakok; Egyéb
pt-PT: Configuração das janelas da capota: Sem janelas; Janela traseira panorâmica; Janela traseira e vidros de custódia; Janelas traseiras e laterais (3 janelas); Apenas janela traseira; Janelas amovíveis; Vidros fumados; Outra
ja: ソフトトップウィンドウ構造: ウィンドウなし; パノラマリアウィンドウ; リア + クォーターウィンドウ; リア + サイドウィンドウ (3ウィンドウ); リアウィンドウのみ; 取り外し可能ウィンドウ; ティントウィンドウ; その他
vi: Cấu hình cửa sổ mui mềm: Không có cửa sổ; Cửa sổ sau toàn cảnh; Cửa sổ sau + cửa sổ góc; Cửa sổ sau + cửa sổ bên (3 cửa sổ); Chỉ có cửa sổ sau; Cửa sổ có thể tháo rời; Cửa sổ tối màu; Khác
nb: Vinduskonfigurasjon for bilpresenning: Uten vinduer; Panoramabakvindu; Bakvindu + sidevinduer bak; Bakvindu + sidevinduer (3 vinduer); Kun bakvindu; Avtakbare vinduer; Tonede vinduer; Annet
es: Configuración de ventanas de la capota blanda.: Sin ventanas; Ventana trasera panorámica; Ventana trasera y ventanillas laterales; Ventana trasera y lateral (3 ventanas); Solo ventana trasera; Ventanas desmontables; Ventanas tintadas; Otro